Wyoming, session 2025, HB0161.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-14-213 is created to read:

39-14-213. Taxation of certain hydrogen production.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0161

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0634
(i) "Hydrogen" means hydrogen subject to
taxation pursuant to the provisions of this section;

(ii) "Hydrogen production" means the separation
of hydrogen from water that is produced from the ground;

(iii) All other definitions in W.S. 39-14-201
are incorporated herein by reference to the extent that
they may apply.

(b) Administration; confidentiality: The department
shall annually value and assess hydrogen production at its
fair market value for taxation in accordance with the
applicable provisions of W.S. 39-14-202.

(c) Taxable event: There is levied a severance tax
on the value of the gross product resulting from hydrogen
production in this state. The tax imposed by this
subsection shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed
by law.

(d) Basis of tax: Hydrogen shall be valued for
taxation as natural gas as provided in W.S. 39-14-203(b).
HB0161

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0634

(e) Taxpayer: Any person engaging in hydrogen
production; or, to the extent of his ownership interest,
any person owning an interest in the hydrogen, is liable
for the payment of the severance tax together with any
penalties and interest. Nothing in this subsection shall
be deemed to require the tax to be paid more than one (1)
time as provided in this section.

(f) Tax rate: Hydrogen resulting from hydrogen
production shall be subject to the following severance tax
rates:

(i) Hydrogen produced from by-product water as
defined in W.S. 41-3-903 shall be subject to a severance
tax rate of three percent (3%);

(ii) All other hydrogen produced from water
shall be subject to a severance tax rate of six percent
(6%).

HB0161

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0634
(g) Exemptions: The exemptions from taxation
provided by W.S. 39-14-205 for natural gas shall apply to
hydrogen under this section.

(h) Compliance; collection procedures: The severance
tax related provisions of W.S. 39-14-207 shall apply to
hydrogen production.

(j) Enforcement: All severance tax related
provisions of W.S. 39-14-208 shall apply to hydrogen
production.

(k) Taxpayer remedies: All severance tax related
provisions of W.S. 39-14-209 shall apply to hydrogen
production.

(m) Distribution: Severance tax revenues from
hydrogen production shall be distributed as provided by
W.S. 39-14-211.

Section 2. This act shall apply to any hydrogen
production on or after July 1, 2025.

HB0161

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0634
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0161